Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5227.01
Affiliation period, defined.

Affiliation period means a period of time that must expire before health insurance coverage provided by a carrier becomes effective and during which the carrier is not required to provide benefits.

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 31.